Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.170

First-class school districts—Emergency or additional appropriation resolutions—Procedure.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, upon the happening of any emergency in first-class school districts caused by fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, riot, insurrection, or for the restoration to a condition of usefulness of any school district property, the usefulness of which has been destroyed by accident, and no provision has been made for such expenditures in the adopted appropriation, the board of directors, upon the adoption by the vote of the majority of all board members of a resolution stating the facts constituting the emergency, may make an appropriation therefor without notice or hearing.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if in first-class districts it becomes necessary to increase the amount of the appropriation, and if the reason is not one of the emergencies specifically enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, the school district board of directors, before incurring expenditures in excess of the appropriation, shall adopt a resolution stating the facts and the estimated amount of appropriation to meet it.

Such resolution shall be voted on at a public meeting, notice to be given in the manner provided in RCW 28A.505.050. Its introduction and passage shall require the vote of a majority of all members of the school district board of directors.

Any person may appear at the meeting at which the appropriation resolution is to be voted on and be heard for or against the adoption thereof.

Copies of all adopted appropriation resolutions shall be filed with the educational service district who shall forward one copy each to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. One copy shall be retained by the educational service district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 424; 1984 c 128 s 9; 1983 c 59 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 17. Formerly RCW 28A.65.480.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.